District of Columbia statutes.
16-531

Attachment dockets; index of attachments.

The clerk of the court shall keep an attachment docket, in which, as well as in the regular docket, shall be entered all attachments levied upon real estate, with a description, in brief, of the real estate so levied upon. The attachments shall be indexed in the names of the defendant and of any person in whose possession the estate may have been levied upon.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 551, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-531.
1973 Ed., § 16-531.